Hawaii statutes.
[D.
Miscellaneous Provisions]

Revision Note

Subpart heading added by revisor pursuant to §23G-15.

[§346-181] Preschool open doors program.
(a) There is established within the department a school readiness program to
be known as the preschool open doors program within the department's child care
assistance program. The program shall:

(1) Provide access to school readiness services that
address children's physical, cognitive, linguistic, social, and emotional
development;

(2) Require each provider to conduct school readiness
assessments;

(3) Give priority to children from low- and
moderate-income families; and

(4) Prepare children for school through either of the
State's two official languages.

(b) Subject to the availability of funds, the
program shall serve four-year-old children, with priority extended to:

(1) Children who are not eligible to attend public
school kindergarten in the calendar year in which they turn five years of age
because their birth date occurs after the kindergarten eligibility date
pursuant to section 302A-411; and

(2) Underserved or at-risk children.

(c) Enrollment in the program shall be
voluntary. A parent or guardian of a child enrolled in the program shall share
in the costs of the program through a copayment according to a sliding fee
scale that is based on need pursuant to rules adopted by the department.

(d) The department may adopt interim rules to
carry out the purposes of this section without regard to chapter 91 or 201M;
provided that:

(1) The department shall hold at least one public
hearing prior to the adoption of interim rules;

(2) The interim rules shall comply with all
applicable state and federal laws; and

(3) The interim rules shall be effective for no more
than one year after their adoption. [L 2013, c 169, §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next